src/morphology/stems/verbstems.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.ASPECT.PFV@
@U.ASPECT.PROG@
@U.ASPECT.POT@
@U.TAMA.%0@
@U.TAMA.%0i@
@U.TAMA.sii@
@U.TAMA.ni@
@U.TAMA.yi-y@
@U.TAMA.yi-a@
@U.TAMA.yi@
@U.TAMA.yii@

LEXICON Root

Verbstems;

LEXICON Verbstems

! N.B. removed English glosses in brackets so that
! analysis and generation in Gunáhà' would work

! itsiy[cry]:tsiy                          INTR-0-IPFV;    ! (IPFV; 0-IPFV)
! itsiy[cry]:tsày                          INTR-yi-y-PFV;  ! (PFV; yi-PFV-yi)
! itsiy[cry]:tsíł                          INTR-yi-PROG;   ! (PROG; yi-PROG)
! itsiy[cry]:ná=chish                      INTR-0-IPFV;    ! (REP; 0-IPFV)

itsiy:tsiy                          INTR-0-IPFV;    ! (IPFV; 0-IPFV)
itsiy:tsày                          INTR-yi-y-PFV;  ! (PFV; yi-PFV-yi)
itsiy:tsíł                          INTR-yi-PROG;   ! (PROG; yi-PROG)
itsiy:ná=chish                      INTR-0-IPFV;    ! (REP; 0-IPFV)

! ts'ázid[wake-up]:ts'á=zíd                INTR-ni-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; ni-IPFV)
! ts'ázid[wake-up]:ts'á=zid                INTR-ni-PFV;    ! (PFV; ni-PFV)
! ts'ázid[wake-up]:ts'á=ził                INTR-yi-PROG;   ! (PROG; yi-PROG) CHECK
! ts'ázid[wake-up]:ts'áná=zhiizh           INTR-ni-IPFV;   ! (REP; ni-IPFV)

ts'ázid:ts'á=zíd                INTR-ni-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; ni-IPFV)
ts'ázid:ts'á=zid                INTR-ni-PFV;    ! (PFV; ni-PFV)
ts'ázid:ts'á=ził                INTR-yi-PROG;   ! (PROG; yi-PROG) CHECK
ts'ázid:ts'áná=zhiizh           INTR-ni-IPFV;   ! (REP; ni-IPFV)

! ! CHECK
! nàgudiitłod[jump-down]:nà=gu_di.tłod     INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; 0i-IPFV)
! nàgudiitłod[jump-down]:nà=gu_di.tłòt     INTR-sii-PFV;   ! (PFV; sii-PFV)
! nàgudiitłod[jump-down]:nà=gu_di.tłíł     INTR-yii-PROG;  ! (PROG; yii-PROG)
! nàgudiitłod[jump-down]:nàná=gu_di.tłiizh INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
! nàgudiitłod[jump-down]:nìná=gu_di.tłiizh INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
! ! nàná == nìná == nìí

nàgudiitłod:nà=gu_di.tłod     INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; 0i-IPFV)
nàgudiitłod:nà=gu_di.tłòt     INTR-sii-PFV;   ! (PFV; sii-PFV)
nàgudiitłod:nà=gu_di.tłíł     INTR-yii-PROG;  ! (PROG; yii-PROG)
nàgudiitłod:nàná=gu_di.tłiizh INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
nàgudiitłod:nìná=gu_di.tłiizh INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
! ! nàná == nìná == nìí
 
! ! CHECK
! tsídiitł'á[run-away]:tsí=di.tł'á         INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; 0i-IPFV)
! tsídiitł'á[run-away]:tsí=di.tł'ò         INTR-sii-PFV;   ! (PFV; sii-PFV)
! tsídiitł'á[run-away]:tsí=di.tł'áł        INTR-yii-PROG;  ! (PROG; yii-PROG)
! tsídiitł'á[run-away]:nátsí=di.tł'ásh     INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
! tsídiitł'á[run-away]:tsí=di.tl'ò         INTR-yii-POT;   ! (POT; yii-POT)

tsídiitł'á:tsí=di.tł'á         INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (IPFV; 0i-IPFV)
tsídiitł'á:tsí=di.tł'ò         INTR-sii-PFV;   ! (PFV; sii-PFV)
tsídiitł'á:tsí=di.tł'áł        INTR-yii-PROG;  ! (PROG; yii-PROG)
tsídiitł'á:nátsí=di.tł'ásh     INTR-0i-IPFV;   ! (REP; 0i-IPFV)
tsídiitł'á:tsí=di.tl'ò         INTR-yii-POT;   ! (POT; yii-POT)



!
! Non-past/imperfective (IPFV) forms
!
LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@ Verbsuffixes;

!
! Past/perfective (PFV) forms
!
LEXICON INTR-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.sii@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-y-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@ Verbsuffixes;

!
! Progressive (PROG) forms
!
LEXICON INTR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@ Verbsuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yii-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@ Verbsuffixes;

!
! Potential (POT) forms
!
LEXICON INTR-yii-POT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yii@ Verbsuffixes;


!
! Suffixes and enclitics.
!
LEXICON Verbsuffixes

!-gù[manner]:-gù   #;
                  #;

! OUTER.PFX#    --> OUTER.PFX=
! OUTER.SBJ/DO% --> OUTER.SBJ_
! INNER.PFX-    --> INNER.PFX.
